Utah statutes.
35A-3-510.   Coalition of civic and other organizations.

The director shall convene a coalition of civic organizations, representatives of the division, representatives of state and local agencies, advocacy organizations, public officials, community leaders, members of the Legislature, and other persons and organizations as he determines.  The coalition shall offer advice to the director on issues relevant to this part.

